Washington statutes.
RCW 19.105.520

Unlawful to represent director's administrative approval as determination as to merits of resort—Penalty.

(1) Neither the fact that an application for registration nor the written disclosures required by this chapter have been filed, nor the fact that a camping resort contract offering has been effectively registered or exempted, constitutes a finding by the director that the offering or any document filed under this chapter is true, complete, and not misleading, nor does the fact mean that the director has determined in any way the merits or qualifications of or recommended or given approval to any person, camping resort operator, or camping resort contract transaction.

(2) It is a gross misdemeanor to make or cause to be made to any prospective purchaser any representation inconsistent with this section.

[ 2003 c 53 s 153; 1988 c 159 s 26; 1982 c 69 s 24.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.